Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2460
Special administrator; formal proceedings; powers and duties.

A special administrator appointed by order of the court in any formal proceeding has the power of a personal representative except as limited in the appointment and duties as prescribed in the order. The appointment may be for a specified time, to perform particular acts or on other terms as the court may direct.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 138, UPC § 3-617;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 15.